Louisiana, session 2026, SB403.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:67.8 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§67.8. Unauthorized possession of copper or brass material
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Cable service provider" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
45:1611.
(2) "Carrier" has the same meaning as provided in R.S. 32:1502 and
includes a "common carrier" as defined in R.S. 45:251.
(3) "Copper or brass material" means:
(a) A power inverter, bus bar, insulated or noninsulated copper wire or
cable that contains copper or an alloy of copper and zinc, and that is of the type
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-124 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 403
used by a:
(i) Cable service provider.
(ii) Carrier.
(iii) Person responsible for the construction, maintenance, service, or
operation of a pipeline.
(iv) Public utility.
(v) Telecommunications service provider.
(vi) Video service provider.
(b) Any copper or brass item of a type commonly used in construction
or by a person listed in this Subsection.
(4) "Pipeline" has the same meaning as provided in R.S. 14:61 and
includes a "pipe line" as defined in R.S. 45:251.
(5) "Public utility" has the same meaning as provided in R.S. 48:1.
(6) "Telecommunications service" has the same meaning as provided in
R.S. 47:301.
(7) "Video service provider" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
45:1611.
B. No person shall knowingly and intentionally possess copper or brass
material unless authorized by Subsection C of this Section to possess copper or
brass material.
C. The following may possess copper or brass material:
(1) The owner of the material.
(2) A public utility.
(3) A carrier.
(4) A person responsible for the construction, maintenance, service, or
operation of a pipeline.
(5) A telecommunications service provider.
(6) A cable service provider.
(7) A video service provider.
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-124 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 403
(8) A scrap metal recycling facility as defined in R.S. 37:1962.
(9) A secondhand dealer as defined in R.S. 37:1861.
(10) A manufacturing, industrial, commercial, retail, or other business
that sells copper or brass material in the ordinary course and scope of doing
business.
(11) A person who lawfully acquires possession of copper or brass
material during construction, remodeling, demolition, or salvage of a building
or other structure in which the material was installed or contained.
(12) An agent acting within the course and scope of his authority on
behalf of a person listed in Paragraphs (1) through (11) of this Subsection.
D. The provisions of Subsection C of this Section shall not apply to a
person who knows that the copper or brass material he possesses is stolen.
E. Except as provided in Subsection F of this Section, whoever violates
the provisions of Subsection B of this Section shall be fined not more than ten
thousand dollars, or imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not more than
two years, or both.
F. If any of the following circumstances are present at the time the
offense was committed, a person who violates the provisions of Subsection B of
this Section shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars, or imprisoned,
with or without hard labor, for not less than five years nor more than ninety-
nine years, or both:
(1) The copper or brass material possessed in violation of Subsection B
of this Section was obtained from either:
(a) Critical infrastructure as defined by R.S. 14:61.
(b) Equipment or wires that are not enclosed by any type of physical
barrier but are connected or appurtenant to critical infrastructure, and the
critical infrastructure or its component equipment or parts either depend on the
appurtenant equipment or wires to properly function, or suffer an impairment
or interruption of function, operation, production, or service either in whole or
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-124 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 403
in part.
(2) The offender has a prior conviction for any of the following with
respect to copper or brass material:
(a) An offense under this Section.
(b) Criminal mischief, R.S. 14:59.
(c) Theft, R.S. 14:67.
(d) Criminal conspiracy to commit theft or criminal mischief, R.S. 14:26.
(e) An offense under the Louisiana Racketeering Act, R.S. 15:1351 et seq.
(3) The offender possessed a firearm during the commission of the
offense.
G. Prosecution under this Section shall not preclude prosecution under
any other applicable provision of law.